Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Part 9

Freedom in Contracting Act

12-4-901. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Freedom in Contracting Act.”

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 7, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any provision of this part shall not apply to the extent that compliance with such provision would violate federal law or cause a loss of federal funding.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 8, provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

12-4-902.
Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to prohibit public agencies from imposing certain labor and wage requirements as a condition of performing public works that are state funded in part or in whole.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 7, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any provision of this part shall not apply to the extent that compliance with such provision would violate federal law or cause a loss of federal funding.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 8, provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

12-4-903. Prohibited provisions in bid specifications, project agreements and other documents.

The state and its political subdivisions, agencies and instrumentalities thereof, when engaged in procuring products or services or letting contracts to be funded in part or in whole with state funds, shall ensure that no bid specifications, project agreements and other controlling documents, entered into, required or subject to approval by the state, subdivision, agency or instrumentality:

Require bidders, offerors, contractors or subcontractors to enter into or adhere to agreements with one (1) or more labor organizations on the same or related projects;

Discriminate against bidders, offerors, contractors or subcontractors for refusing to become or remain signatories or otherwise adhere to agreements with one (1) or more labor organizations on the same or related construction projects; or

Require any bidder, offeror, contractor or subcontractor to enter into, adhere to or enforce any agreement that requires its employees as a condition of employment to:

Become members of or become affiliated with a labor organization or employee organization of any kind;

Pay dues or fees to a labor organization or employee organization, over an employee's objection, in excess of the employee's share of labor or employee organization costs relating to collective bargaining, contract administration or grievance adjustment; or

Require any bidder, offeror, contractor or subcontractor to pay:

Wages that exceed:

The state's most current prevailing wage scale established pursuant to part 4 of this chapter if the agreement involves a state highway construction project, as defined by § 12-4-402; or

The Tennessee Occupational Wages Report, as defined by § 12-4-907, if the agreement involves a construction project other than a project described in subdivision (3)(C)(i)(a) ; or

A specific dollar amount for the provision of fringe benefits for employees.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 4; 2013, ch. 91, § 3; 2013, ch. 280, § 12; 2013, ch. 335, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 7, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any provision of this part shall not apply to the extent that compliance with such provision would violate federal law or cause a loss of federal funding.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 8, provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, ch. 91, § 5 provided that the act, which amended subdivision (3)(C)(i), shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after April 11, 2013.

Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 18 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.

Acts 2013, ch. 335, § 2 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to any action filed on or after May 13, 2013.

12-4-904. Prohibition against issuing grants or agreements conditioned on prohibited provisions.

The state and its political subdivisions, agencies and instrumentalities thereof shall not issue grants or enter into cooperative agreements for construction projects conditioned on a requirement that bid specifications, project agreements or other controlling documents pertaining to the grant or cooperative agreement contain any of the elements specified in § 12-4-903.

The state and its political subdivisions or any agencies or instrumentalities thereof shall exercise such authority as may be required to preclude a grant recipient or party to a cooperative agreement from imposing any of the elements specified in § 12-4-903 in connection with any grant or cooperative agreement awarded or entered into.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 7, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any provision of this part shall not apply to the extent that compliance with such provision would violate federal law or cause a loss of federal funding.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 8, provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

12-4-905. Standing to challenge bid specifications, project agreements or other agreements.

Any interested party, including a bidder, offeror, contractor, subcontractor, or taxpayer, shall have standing to challenge any bid specification, project agreement, controlling document, grant or cooperative agreement that such party alleges has violated this part. Such party shall be awarded costs and attorney's fees in the event that the challenge prevails.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 7, provided that notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any provision of this part shall not apply to the extent that compliance with such provision would violate federal law or cause a loss of federal funding.

Acts 2011, ch. 233, § 8, provided that the act, which enacted this part, shall apply to contracts entered into on or after July 1, 2011.

12-4-906. Employer to pay employees a wage necessary to meet the federal requirements to obtain federal funds.

If compliance with this part by the state and its political subdivisions, agencies and instrumentalities, relative to a specific contract, project, or program would result in the denial of federal funds that would otherwise be available to the state and its political subdivisions, agencies and instrumentalities, then the state or its political subdivisions, agencies or instrumentalities may require a private employer to pay its employees a wage necessary to meet the federal requirements to obtain the federal funds, but only relative to such contract, project or program.

Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 18 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.

12-4-907. Meaning of the Tennessee occupational wages report.

For purposes of this part, Tennessee occupational wages report means the applicable report that is published by the department of labor and workforce development, employment security division.

Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 280, § 18 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall apply to contracts entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2014.